Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8150. IMPERIAL REDEVELOPMENT DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8150.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "City" means the City of Sugar Land, Texas.

(2-a) "County" means Fort Bend County, Texas.

(3) "Director" means a member of the board.

(4) "District" means the Imperial Redevelopment District.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district in Fort Bend County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and is essential to accomplish the purposes of Sections 52 and 52-a, Article III, Section 1-g, Article VIII, and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and other public purposes stated in this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.0025. DECLARATION OF INTENT. (a) By creating the district and in authorizing the city, the county, and other political subdivisions to contract with the district, the legislature has established a program to accomplish the public purposes set out in Section 52-a, Article III, Texas Constitution.

(b) The district is necessary to promote, develop, encourage, and maintain employment, commerce, transportation, housing, tourism, recreation, the arts, entertainment, economic development, safety, and the public welfare in the district.

(c) This chapter and the creation of the district may not be interpreted to relieve the city or the county from providing services to the area in the district. The district is created to supplement and not to supplant city and county services provided in the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the improvements and services to be provided by the district under powers conferred by Sections 52 and 52-a, Article III, Section 1-g, Article VIII, and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and other powers granted under this chapter.

(b) The district is created for the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by Section 54.012, Water Code;

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements in aid of those roads, including drainage improvements; and

(3) the purchase, construction, acquisition, ownership, improvement, maintenance, and operation of the public works and public improvements authorized for a tax increment reinvestment zone operating under Chapter 311, Tax Code, and a municipal management district operating under Chapter 375, Local Government Code.

(c) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(d) The creation of the district is in the public interest and is essential to further the public purposes of:

(1) developing and diversifying the economy of the state;

(2) eliminating unemployment and underemployment; and

(3) developing or expanding transportation and commerce.

(e) The district will:

(1) promote the health, safety, and general welfare of residents, employers, potential employees, employees, visitors, and consumers in the district, and of the public;

(2) provide needed funding for the district to preserve, maintain, and enhance the economic health and vitality of the district territory as a community and business center; and

(3) promote the health, safety, welfare, and enjoyment of the public by providing pedestrian ways and by landscaping and developing certain areas in the district, which are necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty.

(f) Pedestrian ways along or across a street, whether at grade or above or below the surface, and street lighting, street landscaping, vehicle parking, and street art objects are parts of and necessary components of a street and are considered to be a street or road improvement.

(g) The district will not act as the agent or instrumentality of any private interest even though the district will benefit many private interests as well as the public.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.0035. FINDING ON SPORTS AND COMMUNITY VENUES. A sports and community venue facility is considered to be a park and recreational facility.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.004. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is initially composed of the territory described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect the district's:

(1) organization, existence, or validity;

(2) right to issue any type of bond for the purposes for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on a bond;

(3) right to impose or collect an assessment or tax; or

(4) legality or operation.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.005. CONSTRUCTION OF CHAPTER. This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the findings and purposes set forth in this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.006. CONFLICT OF LAW. If any provision of general law applicable to the district conflicts with Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, prevail.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8150.051. DIRECTORS; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Except as provided by Section 8150.053, directors serve staggered four-year terms.

(c) Section 49.052, Water Code, does not apply to the directors.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.052. APPOINTMENT OF DIRECTORS. The governing body of the city shall appoint the appropriate number of directors to the board to serve staggered terms that expire September 1 of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.053. VACANCIES. (a) The board shall notify the governing body of the city in writing when a vacancy occurs on the board.

(b) The governing body of the city shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(c) If the governing body of the city does not fill a vacancy on the board before the 91st day after receipt of written notice of a vacancy, the remaining directors shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy, if a majority of the directors remain in office. If less than a majority of the directors remain in office, the vacancy shall be filled as provided by Section 49.105(c), Water Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8150.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district is created.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.102. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.1025. MUNICIPAL MANAGEMENT DISTRICT PROJECTS AND SERVICES. The district may provide, design, construct, acquire, improve, relocate, operate, maintain, or finance an improvement, improvement project, or service using money available to the district, or contract with a governmental or private entity to provide, design, construct, acquire, improve, relocate, operate, maintain, or finance an improvement, improvement project, or service authorized under this chapter or Chapter 375, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.103. TAX INCREMENT REINVESTMENT ZONE. (a) All or any part of the area of the district is eligible to be included in a tax increment reinvestment zone created under Chapter 311, Tax Code.

(b) The district may enter into a contract with the board of directors of a reinvestment zone and the governing body of the city that provides for the district to manage or assist in managing the reinvestment zone or to implement or assist in implementing the reinvestment zone's project plan and reinvestment zone financing plan. The contract may require the district to issue bonds or other obligations and pledge the contract revenues to the payment of the bonds or other obligations.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.104. NO EMINENT DOMAIN POWER. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.105. DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION POWERS. The district, using money available to the district, may exercise the powers given to a development corporation under Chapter 505, Local Government Code, including the power to own, operate, acquire, construct, lease, improve, or maintain a project under that chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.106. NONPROFIT CORPORATION. (a) The board by resolution may authorize the creation of a nonprofit corporation to assist and act for the district in implementing a project or providing a service authorized by this chapter.

(b) The nonprofit corporation:

(1) has each power of and is considered to be a local government corporation created under Subchapter D, Chapter 431, Transportation Code; and

(2) may implement any project and provide any service authorized by this chapter.

(c) The board shall appoint the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation. The board of directors of the nonprofit corporation shall serve in the same manner as the board of directors of a local government corporation created under Subchapter D, Chapter 431, Transportation Code, except that a board member is not required to reside in the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.107. MEMBERSHIP IN CHARITABLE ORGANIZATIONS. The district may join and pay dues to a charitable or nonprofit organization that performs a service or provides an activity consistent with the furtherance of a district purpose.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.108. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. (a) The district may engage in activities that accomplish the economic development purposes of the district.

(b) The district may establish and provide for the administration of one or more programs to promote state or local economic development and to stimulate business and commercial activity in the district, including programs to:

(1) make loans and grants of public money; and

(2) provide district personnel and services.

(c) The district may create economic development programs and exercise the economic development powers that:

(1) Chapter 380, Local Government Code, provides to a municipality; and

(2) Subchapter A, Chapter 1509, Government Code, provides to a municipality.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.109. PARKING FACILITIES. (a) The district may acquire, lease as lessor or lessee, construct, develop, own, operate, and maintain parking facilities or a system of parking facilities, including lots, garages, parking terminals, or other structures or accommodations for parking motor vehicles off the streets and related appurtenances.

(b) The district's parking facilities serve the public purposes of the district and are owned, used, and held for a public purpose even if leased or operated by a private entity for a term of years.

(c) The district's parking facilities are parts of and necessary components of a street and are considered to be a street or road improvement.

(d) The development and operation of the district's parking facilities may be considered an economic development program.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.110. SPORTS AND COMMUNITY VENUE FACILITIES. (a) The district may acquire, sell, lease as lessor or lessee, convey, construct, finance, develop, own, operate, maintain, acquire real property interests for, demolish, or reconstruct a sports and community venue facility.

(b) A sports and community venue facility authorized under this section includes:

(1) an arena, coliseum, stadium, or other type of area or facility that is used or is planned for use for one or more professional or amateur sports events, community events, other sports events, promotional events, and other civic or charitable events;

(2) a convention center facility or related improvement such as a convention center, civic center, civic center building, civic center hotel, auditorium, theater, opera house, music hall, exhibition hall, rehearsal hall, park, performing arts center, museum, aquarium, or plaza that is located in the vicinity of a convention center or facility owned by a municipality or a county; and

(3) a facility related to a sports and community venue facility, including a store, restaurant, on-site hotel, concession, or other on-site or off-site improvement that relates to and enhances the use, value, or appeal of a sports and community venue, including an area adjacent to the venue, and any other expenditure reasonably necessary to construct, improve, renovate, or expand a venue, including an expenditure for environmental remediation.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. ADDITIONAL ROAD POWERS

Sec. 8150.151. ROAD PROJECTS. (a) As authorized by Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate, inside and outside the district, roads and road improvements.

(b) The roads and road improvements authorized by Subsection (a) may include drainage, landscaping, pedestrian improvements, lights, signs, or signals that are incidental to the roads and their construction, maintenance, or operation.

(c) The roads and road improvements authorized by this section must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulatory ordinances of the city.

(d) On completion of a road or road improvement authorized by this section, the district, with the consent of the city, may convey the road or road improvement to the city if the conveyance is free of all indebtedness of the district. If the city becomes the owner of a road or road improvement, the city is responsible for all future maintenance and upkeep and the district has no further responsibility for the road or road improvement or its maintenance or upkeep, unless otherwise agreed to by the district and the city.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.152. JOINT ROAD PROJECTS. (a) A district may contract with a state agency, political subdivision, or corporation created under Chapter 431, Transportation Code, for a joint road project.

(b) The contract may:

(1) provide for joint payment of project costs; and

(2) require the state agency, political subdivision, or corporation to design, construct, or improve a project as provided by the contract.

(c) A contract may be a contract under Section 49.108, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.153. REIMBURSEMENT FOR ROAD PROJECT. (a) The district may:

(1) reimburse a private person for money spent to construct a road or road improvement that is dedicated or otherwise transferred to public use; or

(2) purchase a road or road improvement constructed by a private person.

(b) The amount paid for the reimbursement or for the purchase of a road or road improvement under Subsection (a) may:

(1) include all construction costs, including engineering, legal, financing, and other expenses incident to the construction; or

(2) be at a price not to exceed the replacement cost of the road or road improvement as determined by the board.

(c) The reimbursement or purchase of a road or road improvement may be paid for with proceeds from the sale of the district's bonds or from any other money available to the district.

(d) The district may enter into an agreement to use the proceeds of a subsequent bond sale to reimburse a private person under this section. The agreement may provide the terms and conditions under which the road or road improvement is to be dedicated or transferred for the benefit of the public.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 8, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER E. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8150.201. ELECTIONS REGARDING TAXES OR BONDS. (a) The district may issue, without an election, bonds and other obligations secured by:

(1) revenue from any source other than ad valorem taxation; or

(2) contract payments described by Section 8150.203.

(b) The district must hold an election in the manner provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, to obtain voter approval before the district may impose an ad valorem tax or issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes.

(c) The board may include more than one purpose in a single proposition at an election.

(d) The district may issue bonds or other obligations to finance road projects under Section 52(b)(3), Article III, Texas Constitution, secured wholly or partly by ad valorem taxation, impose ad valorem taxes to pay the principal of and interest on the obligations, and provide a sinking fund for the redemption of the obligations only if the issuance is approved by a two-thirds majority of the voters of the district voting at an election held for that purpose. The total amount of bonds issued under this subsection may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed market value of real property of the district as determined by the chief appraiser of the appraisal district that appraises property for the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 9, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.202. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) If authorized by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose, the district may impose an operation and maintenance tax on taxable property in the district in accordance with Section 49.107, Water Code, for any district purpose, including to:

(1) operate and maintain the district;

(2) construct or acquire improvements; and

(3) provide a service.

(b) The board shall determine the tax rate. The rate may not exceed the rate approved at the election.

(c) Section 49.107(h), Water Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 10, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 11, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.203. CONTRACT TAXES. (a) In accordance with Section 49.108, Water Code, the district may impose a tax other than an operation and maintenance tax and use the revenue derived from the tax to make payments under a contract after the provisions of the contract have been approved by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) A contract approved by the district voters may contain a provision stating that the contract may be modified or amended by the board without further voter approval.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 12, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.204. MONEY USED FOR IMPROVEMENTS OR SERVICES. The district may acquire, construct, finance, operate, or maintain any improvement or service authorized under this chapter or Chapter 375, Local Government Code, using any money available to the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 12, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.205. PETITION REQUIRED FOR FINANCING SERVICES AND IMPROVEMENTS WITH ASSESSMENTS. (a) The board may not finance a service or improvement project with assessments under this chapter unless a written petition requesting that service or improvement has been filed with the board.

(b) The petition must be signed by the owners of a majority of the assessed value of real property in the district subject to assessment according to the most recent certified tax appraisal roll for the county.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 12, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.206. METHOD OF NOTICE FOR HEARING. The district may mail the notice required by Section 375.115(c), Local Government Code, by certified or first class United States mail. The board shall determine the method of notice.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 12, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.207. ASSESSMENTS; LIENS FOR ASSESSMENTS. (a) The board by resolution may impose and collect an assessment under Subchapter F, Chapter 375, Local Government Code, for any purpose authorized by this chapter or Chapter 375, Local Government Code, in all or any part of the district.

(b) An assessment, a reassessment, or an assessment resulting from an addition to or correction of the assessment roll by the district, penalties and interest on an assessment or reassessment, an expense of collection, and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the district:

(1) are a first and prior lien against the property assessed;

(2) are superior to any other lien or claim other than a lien or claim for county, school district, or municipal ad valorem taxes; and

(3) are the personal liability of and a charge against the owners of the property even if the owners are not named in the assessment proceedings.

(c) The lien is effective from the date of the board's resolution imposing the assessment until the date the assessment is paid. The board may enforce the lien in the same manner that the board may enforce an ad valorem tax lien against real property.

(d) The board may make a correction to or deletion from the assessment roll that does not increase the amount of assessment of any parcel of land without providing notice and holding a hearing in the manner required for additional assessments.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 12, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.208. TAX AND ASSESSMENT ABATEMENTS. The district may designate reinvestment zones and may grant abatements of a tax or assessment on property in the zones.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 12, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER F. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 8150.251. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, assessments, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for any authorized district purpose.

(b) The district may issue a bond or other obligation in the form of a bond, note, certificate of participation, or other instrument evidencing a proportionate interest in payments to be made by the district, or other type of obligation.

(c) The limitation on the outstanding principal amount of bonds, notes, and other obligations provided by Section 49.4645, Water Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 13, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.252. TAXES FOR BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the board shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct annual ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding as required and in the manner provided by Sections 54.601 and 54.602, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 14, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 8150.254. BONDS PAYABLE FROM REVENUE FROM CERTAIN CONTRACTS. The district may issue bonds payable wholly or partly from the revenue of a contract authorized by Section 8150.103(b) to pay for the implementation of the reinvestment zone's project plan or reinvestment zone financing plan.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1175 (H.B. 3554), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 8150.257. APPROVAL OF CERTAIN BONDS BY TEXAS COMMISSION ON ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY. Section 375.208, Local Government Code, applies to the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1265 (S.B. 1880), Sec. 15, eff. June 17, 2011.